Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB405.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1111. Eligibility for receipt of State resources.(a) Conditions.--A domestic business corporation or a foreign business corporation with 200 or more employees in this Commonwealth shall not be eligible for a State contract, State funding or a State grant if the corporation:(1) has violated 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards) within the previous five years;(2) has been found guilty of an unfair labor practice in this Commonwealth within the previous five years;(3) has violated the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, 123456789101112131415161718 No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, within the previous five years; or(4) fails to submit to the Department of State current bylaws of the corporation, which must provide for a corporation having a governing board, with at least 20% of the members of the governing board of the corporation being current employees of the corporation and elected by the employees of the corporation.(b) Applicability.--This section does not apply if the condition described in subsection (a)(1), (2) or (3) occurred prior to the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. The addition of 15 Pa.C.S. § 1111 shall apply to the following:(1) A State contract entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) State funding approved or otherwise made on or after the effective date of this section.(3) A State grant approved on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0405PN0377 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920